Arkansas, session 2025, HB1355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-4-703(a)(8), concerning additional fines
for offenses committed against or in the presence of a child, is amended to
read as follows to remove a reference to an offense that does not exist:
(8) Sexual indecency with a child, § 5-14-110, if the offense is
a felony or Class A misdemeanor, indecent exposure, § 5-14-112, sexual
assault in the third degree, § 5-14-126, or sexual assault in the fourth
degree, § 5-14-127;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-5-101(i), concerning disposition of
contraband and seized property, is amended to read as follows to clarify
references:
(i)(1) A law enforcement agency disposing of contraband or seized
property under this section shall maintain a written report that includes
without limitation:
(A) A list and description, including without limitation a
serial number, of all property disposed, traded for credit, or sold at
*CEB114*
01/31/2025 10:50:53 AM CEB114

HB1355
auction;
(B) The dollar amount of any credit obtained by the law
enforcement agency and the contact information for the federally licensed
firearms dealer with which the credit is held;
(C) The dollar amount of any funds received at auction and
where the funds were deposited; and
(D) An explanation for any credit used, including without
limitation a description of items purchased with the credit and the dollar
amount of the purchase.
(2) The written report required under subdivision (i)(1) of this
section shall be provided:
(A) To the elected body that oversees the finances and
operations of the law enforcement agency; and
(B) Within thirty (30) days of:
(i) The date a firearm or item of contraband is
traded to a federally licensed firearms dealer by a law enforcement agency;
and
(ii) The date a credit with a federally licensed
firearms dealer is used by the law enforcement agency.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-10-203(a), concerning death by delivery
in the first degree, is amended to read as follows to clarify a reference:
(a) A person commits the offense of death by delivery in the first
degree if:
(1) He or she knowingly delivers or conveys methamphetamine,
heroin, or cocaine to another person; and
(2) The injection, ingestion, inhalation, or other introduction
of the methamphetamine, heroin, or cocaine, including any adulterants or
diluents, is the cause of death of the other person.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-10-204(a), concerning death by delivery
in the second degree, is amended to read as follows to clarify a reference:
(a) A person commits the offense of death by delivery in the second
degree if:
(1) He or she knowingly delivers or conveys to another person:
(A) A controlled substance that is not fentanyl,
01/31/2025 10:50:53 AM CEB114

HB1355
methamphetamine, heroin, or cocaine; or
(B) A counterfeit substance; and
(2) The injection, ingestion, inhalation, or other introduction
of the controlled substance or counterfeit substance, including any
adulterants or diluents, is the cause of death of the other person.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-10-209 is amended to read as follows to
clarify a reference:
5-10-209. Factors considered when determining whether person possessed
controlled substance for personal use.
For purposes of this subchapter, possession of a controlled substance
or counterfeit substance for personal use may be demonstrated through the
consideration of certain factors, including without limitation:
(1) The person does not possess the means to weigh, separate, or
package the controlled substance or counterfeit substance
(2) The person does not possess a record indicating a drug-
related transaction;
(3) The controlled substance or counterfeit substance is not
separated or packaged in a manner to facilitate delivery or conveyance;
(4) The person does not possess a firearm that is in the
immediate physical control of the person at the time of the delivery or
conveyance of the controlled substance or counterfeit substance; and
(5) The person does not possess other controlled substances or
counterfeit substances at the time of the delivery or conveyance.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 5-10-210 is amended to read as follows to
clarify a reference:
5-10-210. Accomplice liability.
An individual who is an accomplice under § 5-2-403 to the delivery or
conveyance in aggravated death by delivery, § 5-10-202, death by delivery in
the first degree, § 5-10-203, or death by delivery in the second degree, § 5-
10-204, is an accomplice for the purposes of this section an offense under
this subchapter.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 5-29-202(3), concerning the definition of
“caregiver” under the Vulnerable Person Protection Act, is amended to read as
01/31/2025 10:50:53 AM CEB114

HB1355
follows to clarify a reference:
(3) “Caregiver” means a person who is not a healthcare provider
but has assumed the responsibility for the protection, care, or custody of a
vulnerable person including without limitation a non-healthcare employee of a
healthcare provider, a volunteer, a person with a power of attorney for the
vulnerable person, or a guardian;

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 5-74-109(j)(3)(A)(i), concerning civil
remedies for premises and real property used by criminal gangs,
organizations, or enterprises, or used by anyone in committing a continuing
series of violations, is amended to read as follows to clarify the recipient
of damages under a court order:
(3)(A)(i) If the court finds that a vacancy resulting from
closure of the building or place may create a nuisance or that closure is
otherwise harmful to the community, in lieu of ordering the building or place
closed, the court may order the person who is seeking to keep the premises
open to pay damages in an amount equal to the fair market rental value of the
building or place, for a period of time as determined appropriate by the
court, to the city attorney, prosecuting attorney, or the Attorney General.

SECTION 9. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
01/31/2025 10:50:53 AM CEB114

HB1355
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.



































01/31/2025 10:50:53 AM CEB114